Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-804
Sample ballots; distribution.

If in the judgment of the election commissioner, county clerk, or city or village clerk the sample ballot published in the newspaper will not be seen by the voters generally, sample ballots may be printed on light red, light green, or light pink paper. The sample ballots shall be distributed not less than three nor more than thirty-five days before the election in an amount not to exceed ten percent of the total number of votes cast in such county, city, or village at the immediately preceding general election. The separate sample ballots shall be of the exact size and form as the official ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 225.